Arkansas, session 2025, HB1398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-713(a), concerning the definition
relating to student sudden cardiac arrest education, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) As used in this section, “athletic activity”:
(1)(A) "Athletic activity" means an organized athletic activity
that is sponsored or associated with a school and in which the participants,
a majority of whom are under nineteen (19) years of age, are:
(A)(i) Engaged in an athletic game or competition against
another team, club, or entity; or
(B)(ii) In practice or preparation for an organized
athletic game or competition against another team, club, or entity.
(2)(B) As used in this section, “athletic activity” "Athletic
activity" includes without limitation:
(A)(i) Interscholastic athletics;
*JMB014*
03-10-2025 11:45:50 JMB014

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1398
(B)(ii) Cheerleading, whether or not the cheerleading is
competitive;
(C)(iii) Club-sponsored sports activities; and
(D)(iv) Sports activities sponsored by school-affiliated
organizations;
(2) “Automated external defibrillator” means the same as defined
in § 20-13-1303;
(3) “Cardiopulmonary resuscitation” means the same as defined in
§ 20-13-1303;
(4) "Cardiac emergency response plan" means a written document
that establishes the specific steps to be taken during a suspected cardiac
emergency or similar life-threatening emergency to reduce death from cardiac
arrest in any setting; and
(5) "Sudden cardiac arrest" means a medical condition in which
the heart stops beating unexpectedly and can quickly lead to death.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-713, concerning student sudden cardiac
arrest education, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(g)(1) Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, each school shall
develop and implement a protocol within the emergency operation plan
addressing a cardiac emergency response plan that addresses the appropriate
use of school personnel to respond to incidents involving an individual
experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency
while on school grounds.
(2) In developing a cardiac emergency response plan, a school
shall ensure that the cardiac emergency response plan includes without
limitation:
(A) Integrated nationally recognized core elements, such
as elements recommended by a nationally recognized organization focused on
emergency cardiovascular care;
(B) The establishment of a cardiac emergency response
team;
(C) A requirement that the cardiac emergency response team
be activated in response to a sudden cardiac arrest;
(D)(i) A process for automated external defibrillator
03-10-2025 11:45:50 JMB014

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1398
placement and routine maintenance within the school.
(ii) Appropriate automated external defibrillator
placement shall be determined by the cardiac emergency response plan in
accordance with guidelines of the American Heart Association or an
organization focused on emergency cardiovascular care.
(iii) An automated external defibrillator shall be:
(a) Placed on site;
(b) Identified with appropriate signage;
(c) Made available in an unlocked location on
school property; and
(d) Encouraged to be used on an individual
experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency
within three (3) minutes;
(E) A requirement that the cardiac emergency response plan
be disseminated throughout the school campus;
(F)(i) A process for maintenance of ongoing staff training
in the use of cardiopulmonary resuscitation or automated external
defibrillator, or both.
(ii) Appropriate school staff shall be trained in
use of first-aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and automated external
defibrillator through guidelines of a nationally recognized organization
focused on emergency cardiovascular care;
(G) The incorporation of annual practice drills regarding
sudden cardiac arrest;
(H)(i) The integration of local emergency medical services
with the cardiac emergency response plan.
(ii) School officials shall work directly with local
emergency service providers to integrate the cardiac emergency response plan
into the community’s emergency medical services responder protocols; and
(I) A procedure for review and evaluate the cardiac
emergency response plan.
(3) The Department of Education may establish a procedure for
monitoring adherence by schools to the requirements under this section.
(4) A school shall incorporate the requirements of this section
at the next scheduled revision of the school's emergency operations plan, but
no later than the 2026-2027 school year
03-10-2025 11:45:50 JMB014

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1398

/s/L. Johnson


































03-10-2025 11:45:50 JMB014